Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.354

High-performance public buildings requirements.

Institutions of higher education must comply with high-performance public building[s] requirements under RCW 39.35D.010 through 39.35D.030 and 39.35D.060.

[ 2005 c 12 s 8.]